California statutes. Corporations Code
This part shall be known as the Cooperative Corporation Law. This part is intended primarily to apply to the organization and operation of cooperatives, including, but not limited to, consumer cooperatives, worker cooperatives, and cooperatives formed for the purpose of recycling or treating hazardous waste that elect to incorporate under its provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 3.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.

Subject to any other provision of law of this state applying to the particular class of corporation or line of activity, a corporation may be formed under this part for any lawful purpose provided that it shall be organized and shall conduct its business primarily for the mutual benefit of its members as patrons of the corporation. The earnings, savings, or benefits of the corporation shall be used for the general welfare of the members or shall be proportionately and equitably distributed to some or all of its members or its patrons, based upon their patronage (Section 12243) of the corporation, in the form of cash, property, evidences of indebtedness, capital credits, memberships, or services.

Such corporations are democratically controlled and are not organized to make a profit for themselves, as such, or for their members, as such, but primarily for their members as patrons (Section 12243).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 12201, the net earnings and losses of a worker cooperative shall be apportioned and distributed at the time and in the manner specified in the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(b) Net earnings declared as patronage distributions with respect to a period of time, and paid to a creditor or member, shall be apportioned among the members in accordance with the ratio that each member’s patronage during the period bears to total patronage by all members during the period.

(c) The apportionment, distribution, and payment of net earnings required by subdivision (a) may be paid in cash, credits, written notices of
 allocation, or capital stock issued by the worker cooperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 4.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12202.

(a) The provisions of this part apply to corporations existing pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3 of Title 1 in effect immediately prior to January 1, 1984.

(b) The existence of corporations formed or existing on the date of enactment of this part shall not be affected by the enactment or reenactment of this part or by any change in the requirements for the formation of corporations or by the amendment or repeal of the laws under which they were formed or created.

(c) Neither the repeal of Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3 of Title 1 as in effect immediately prior to January 1, 1984, nor the reenactment or amendment of this part shall impair or take away any existing liability or cause of action against any corporation, its members, shareholders, directors, or officers incurred prior to the enactment of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12203.

Unless the provisions or the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this part govern the construction of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions and Definitions [12210. - 12256.]

12210.

A corporation may be sued as provided in the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12211.

Any corporation shall, as a condition of its existence as a corporation, be subject to the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure authorizing the attachment of corporate property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12212.

The fees of the Secretary of State for filing instruments by or on behalf of corporations are prescribed in Article 3 (commencing with Section 12180) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12213.

Any agreement, certificate, or other instrument filed pursuant to the provisions of this part, may be corrected with respect to any misstatement of fact contained therein, any defect in the execution thereof or any other error or defect contained therein, by filing a certificate of correction entitled “Certificate of Correction of ____ (insert here the title of the agreement, certificate or other instrument to be corrected and the name of the corporation or corporations).” However, no such certificate of correction shall alter the wording of any resolution which was in fact adopted by the board or the members or delegates or effect a corrected amendment of
 articles which amendment as so corrected would not in all respects have complied with the requirements of this part, at the time of filing of the agreement, certificate or other instrument being corrected. Such certificate of correction shall be signed and verified or acknowledged as provided in this part with respect to the agreement, certificate or other instrument being corrected. It shall set forth the following:

(a) The name or names of the corporation or corporations.

(b) The date the agreement, certificate or other instrument being corrected was filed.

(c) The provision in the agreement, certificate or other instrument as corrected and, if the execution was defective, wherein it was defective.

The filing of the certificate of correction shall not alter the effective
 time of the agreement, certificate or other instrument being corrected, which shall remain as its original effective time, and such filing shall not affect any right or liability accrued or incurred before such filing, except that any right or liability accrued or incurred by reason of the error or defect being corrected shall be extinguished by such filing if the person having such right has not detrimentally relied on the original instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12214.

(a) Upon receipt of any instrument by the Secretary of State for filing pursuant to this part, if it conforms to law, it shall be filed by, and in the office of the Secretary of State and the date of filing endorsed thereon. Except for instruments filed pursuant to Section 12570 the date of filing shall be the date the instrument is received by the Secretary of State unless the instrument provides that it is to be withheld from filing until a future date, other than instruments filed pursuant to Section 12220.5, or, unless in the judgment of the Secretary of State, the filing is intended to be coordinated with the filing of some other corporate document which cannot be filed. The Secretary of State shall file a document as of any requested
 future date not more than 90 days after its receipt, including a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, if the document is received in the Secretary of State’s office at least one business day prior to the requested date of filing. An instrument does not fail to conform to law because it is not accompanied by the full filing fee if the unpaid portion of the fee does not exceed the limits established by the policy of the Secretary of State for extending credit in these cases.

(b) If the Secretary of State determines that an instrument submitted for filing or otherwise submitted does not conform to law and returns it to the person submitting it, the instrument may be resubmitted accompanied by a written opinion of the member of the State Bar of California submitting the instrument, or representing the person submitting it, to the effect
 that the specific provision of the instrument objected to by the Secretary of State does conform to law and stating the points and authorities upon
 which the opinion is based. The Secretary of State shall rely, with respect to any disputed point of law, other than the application of Section 12302, upon that written opinion in determining whether the instrument conforms to law. The date of filing in that case shall be the date the instrument is received on resubmission.

(c) Any instrument filed with respect to a corporation, other than original articles or instruments filed pursuant to Section 12220.5, may provide that it is to become effective not more than 90 days subsequent to its filing date. In case such a delayed effective date is specified, the instrument may be prevented from becoming effective by a certificate stating that by appropriate corporate action it has been revoked and is null and void, executed in the same manner as the original instrument and filed before the specified
 effective date. In the case of a merger agreement, the certificate revoking the earlier filing need only be executed on behalf of one of the constituent corporations. If no revocation certificate is filed, the instrument becomes effective on the date specified.

(d) Any instrument submitted to the Secretary of State for filing pursuant to this part by a domestic corporation or foreign corporation that is qualified to transact business in California under Section 2105 shall include the entity name and number as they exist on the Secretary of State’s records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 32.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12214.5.

The Secretary of State may cancel the filing of articles if a check or other remittance accepted in payment of the filing fee or franchise tax is not paid upon presentation. Within 90 days of receiving written notification that the item presented for payment has not been honored for payment, the Secretary of State shall give written notice of the applicability of this section and the cancellation date which shall be not less than 20 days from the date of mailing the written notice as certified by the Secretary of State, to the agent for service of process or to the person submitting the instrument. Thereafter, if the amount has not been paid by cashier’s check or equivalent before the date of cancellation as stated in the
 written notice of cancellation, the cancellation shall thereupon be effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 73.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12214.6.

(a) A corporation that (1) fails to file a statement pursuant to Section 12570 for an applicable filing period, (2) has not filed a statement pursuant to Section 12570 during the preceding 24 months, and (3) was certified for penalty pursuant to Section 12670 for the same filing period of the prior year, shall be subject to suspension pursuant to this section rather than to a penalty under Section 12670.

(b) When subdivision (a) is applicable, the Secretary of State shall mail a
 notice to the corporation informing the corporation that its corporate powers, rights, and privileges will be suspended 60 days from the date of the notice if the corporation does not file the statement required by Section 12570.

(c) If the 60-day period expires without the delinquent corporation filing the required statement, the Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the suspension, and mail a notice of the suspension to the corporation. Following completion of these notification requirements, except for the purpose of amending the articles of incorporation to set forth a new name or filing an application for exempt status, the corporate powers, rights, and privileges of the corporation are suspended.

(d) A statement required by Section 12570 may be filed, notwithstanding suspension of the corporate powers, rights, and privileges under this section or under
 provisions of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Upon the filing of a statement under Section 12570, by a corporation that has been suspended pursuant to this section, the Secretary of State shall certify that fact to the Franchise Tax Board and the corporation may, in accordance with Section 23305a of the Revenue and Taxation Code, be relieved from suspension, unless the corporation is held in suspension by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 589, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12215.

Except as otherwise permitted, any reference in this part to mailing means first-class mail, postage prepaid, unless registered or some other form of mail is specified or permitted. Registered mail includes certified mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 792, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12216.

If the articles provide for more than one vote for any member on any matter, the references in Sections 12223 and 12224 to a majority or other proportion of members mean, as to such matters, a majority or other proportion of the votes entitled to be cast. Whenever members are disqualified from voting on any matter, they shall not be counted for the determination of a quorum at any meeting to act upon, or the required vote to approve action upon, that matter under any other provision of this part or the articles or bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12217.

All references in this part to financial statements of a corporation mean statements prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles or some other basis of accounting which reasonably sets forth the assets and liabilities and the income and expenses of the corporation and discloses the accounting basis used in their preparation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12218.

As used in this part, “independent accountant” means a certified public accountant or public accountant who is independent of the corporation as determined in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and who is engaged to audit financial statements of the corporation or perform other accounting services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12219.

Any reference in this part to the time a notice is given or sent means, unless otherwise expressly provided, the time a written notice by mail is deposited in the United States mails, postage prepaid; or the time any other written notice is personally delivered to the recipient or is delivered to a common carrier for transmission, or actually transmitted by the person giving the notice by electronic means, to the recipient; or the time any oral notice is communicated, in person or by telephone or wireless, to the recipient or to a person at the office of the recipient who the person giving the notice has reason to believe will promptly communicate it to the
 recipient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12220.

A notice or report mailed or delivered as part of a newsletter, magazine or other organ regularly sent to members shall constitute written notice or report pursuant to this part when addressed and mailed postage prepaid by first or second class mail or delivered to the member, or in the case of members who are residents of the same household and who have the same address on the books of the corporation, when addressed and mailed postage prepaid by first or second class mail or delivered to one of such members, at the address appearing on the books of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12220.5.

(a) (1) Otherwise lawful corporate actions not in compliance, or purportedly not in compliance, with this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the corporate action, may be ratified, or validated by the superior court, in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(2) Except as otherwise determined by the superior court pursuant to subdivision (e), a ratification or validation of a corporate action in accordance with this section is conclusive in the absence of fraud.

(3) This section does not limit the authority of the board, the members, or the corporation to effect any
 other lawful means of ratification or validation of a corporate action or correction of a record.

(4) No corporate action may be ratified under subdivision (b) by a dissolved corporation or a foreign corporation, and no petition may be filed under subdivision (e) in respect of any corporate action of such a corporation.

(5) This section shall not be used to ratify or validate any corporate action in respect of any of the following:

(A) Noncompliance with subdivision (a) of Section 12371.

(B) Noncompliance with subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 12373.

(C) Noncompliance with Section 12375.

(b) (1) A
 ratification of a corporate action pursuant to this section, other than a ratification relating to the election of the initial directors pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subdivision, shall be approved by the board and, as applicable, approved by the members in accordance with any provision set forth in this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party that is applicable to the type of corporate action proposed to be ratified and in effect at the time of the ratification, unless there are no members entitled to vote on the ratification at the time of the ratification, in which case the ratification shall be approved solely by the board, or a higher approval standard that was or would have been applicable to the original taking or purported taking of the corporate action, in which case the ratification shall be approved in accordance with such higher approval standard. In order to approve a ratification of a corporate action pursuant to this paragraph, the board
 and, as applicable, the members shall adopt resolutions setting forth all of the following:

(A) Each corporate action to be ratified.

(B) The date when each such corporate action was purportedly taken, and the date any such corporate action shall be deemed to have become effective pursuant to this section if different than the date the corporate action was purportedly taken.

(C) The nature of the noncompliance or purported noncompliance of each such corporate action.

(D) A statement that the ratification of each such corporate action is approved.

(2) If the corporate action to be ratified relates to the election of the initial directors pursuant to Section 12316, a majority of the persons
 who, at the time of the ratification, are exercising the powers of directors may approve that ratification by adopting resolutions setting forth all of the following:

(A) The name of the person or persons who first took action in the name of the corporation as the initial directors of the corporation.

(B) The earlier of the date on which such persons first took such action or were purported to have been elected as the initial directors, and the date on which such person or persons shall be deemed to have become the initial directors of the corporation pursuant to this section if different than the date of such first action or purported election, as applicable.

(C) That the ratification of the election of such person or persons as the initial directors is approved.

(c) Notice of any ratification of a corporate action pursuant to this section shall be given promptly after ratification pursuant to subdivision (b) to each member, regardless of whether approval of the members is required for the ratification. The notice shall be given as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 12461 and shall include a copy of any resolutions adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) and a copy of this section. 

(d) (1) If a corporate action ratified pursuant to this section would have required the filing of an instrument with the Secretary of State pursuant to the provisions of this division, or if such ratification would cause any instrument previously filed with the Secretary of State to be inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect after giving effect to the ratification, the corporation shall file a certificate of ratification to make, amend, or correct each such instrument. The
 certificate of ratification shall have the effect as specified therein, and shall be filed with the Secretary of State. A certificate of ratification shall consist of an officers’ certificate setting forth all of the following:

(A) The name of the corporation and the Secretary of State’s file number of the corporation.

(B) The title of any such instrument whose making, amendment, or correction is being effected by the certificate of ratification.

(C) The date any such instrument was filed with the Secretary of State, or a statement that any such instrument was not previously filed with the Secretary of State and, as applicable, a statement that the ratification approved pursuant to the resolutions set forth in the certificate of ratification would cause any such instrument to be inaccurate or incomplete in any
 material respect after giving effect to the ratification.

(D) The date any such instrument shall be deemed to have become effective pursuant to this section, which may be prior to or after the filing date.

(E) A statement that the certificate of ratification is making, amending, or correcting any such instrument, as applicable, and a copy of any such instrument containing all of the information required to be included under this division for such instrument to be so made, amended, or corrected. An instrument attached to a certificate of ratification pursuant to this subparagraph need not be separately executed and acknowledged and need not include any statement required by any other section of this division that such instrument has been approved and adopted in accordance with the provisions of such other section.

(F) A statement that the ratification has been approved pursuant to subdivision (b), a copy of the resolutions adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) in respect of the ratification.

(2) The office of the Secretary of State may, in its discretion, refuse to file any certificate of ratification if the instrument would render prior filings with the Secretary of State inaccurate, ambiguous, or unintelligible. Upon refusal of the Secretary of State to file a certificate of ratification pursuant to this subdivision, the corporation shall seek validation pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) (1) Upon the filing of a petition by an authorized person, the superior court of the proper county shall have jurisdiction in equity to determine the validity of any corporate action (whether or not such corporate action is a ratification or has been the subject of any
 ratification), validate and declare effective any such corporate action, and declare the date any such corporate action shall be deemed to have become effective or valid, as applicable, pursuant to this section.

(2) This section does not prescribe or circumscribe the facts and circumstances the superior court may consider or which remedies the superior court may grant in exercising its jurisdiction under this section, except as described in this subdivision. The superior court may make any order concerning the corporate action as justice and equity may require.

(3) Any petition relating to a ratification taken or proposed to be taken pursuant to this section shall be filed not later than 180 days after the notice required by subdivision (c) is given, except this paragraph shall not apply to an action asserting that a ratification was not accomplished in accordance with this
 section or to any person to whom notice of the ratification was required to have been given pursuant to subdivision (c), but to whom such notice was not given.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, the proper county shall be the county where the principal office of the corporation is located or, if the principal office is not located in this state, in the county in which the corporation’s agent for service of process is located.

(5) Service of the petition under paragraph (1) upon the registered agent of the corporation shall be deemed to be service upon the corporation, and no other party need be joined in order for the superior court to adjudicate the matter. The superior court may require notice of the action to be provided to other persons specified by the court and permit those other persons to intervene in the action.

(6) For purposes of this subdivision, “authorized person” means the corporation, any successor entity to the corporation, any director, any member, or any other person, so long as the other person claims to be substantially and adversely affected by the ratification of a corporate action pursuant to this section.

(7) Any petition seeking validation of a corporate action shall identify every pending legal proceeding of which the petitioner is aware and in which (A) the validity of the corporate action is being directly challenged or (B) the validation of the corporate action would result in the dismissal of the proceeding in whole or in part. If the petitioner becomes aware of any additional such legal proceeding, the petitioner shall amend, or, to the extent required by applicable rules, move for leave to amend, the petition within 10 court days to identify each such proceeding.
 Identification of a proceeding shall include the venue or forum in which the proceeding was filed, any case number or other unique identifier assigned to the proceeding in that venue or forum, the names of the parties to the proceeding, and the date on which the proceeding was filed.

(f) If a corporate action validated by the superior court pursuant to this section would have required the filing of an instrument with the Secretary of State pursuant to the provisions of this division, or if such validation would cause any instrument previously filed with the Secretary of State to be inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect after giving effect to the validation, the corporation shall file a certificate of validation to make, amend, or correct each such instrument. The certificate of validation shall have the effect as specified therein, and shall be filed with the Secretary of State. A certificate of validation shall consist of an
 officers’ certificate setting forth all of the following:

(1) The name of the corporation and the Secretary of State’s file number of the corporation.

(2) The title of any such instrument whose making, amendment, or correction is being effected by the certificate of validation.

(3) The date any such instrument was filed with the Secretary of State, or a statement that any such instrument was not previously filed with the Secretary of State and, as applicable, a statement that the validation ordered pursuant to the superior court order set forth in the certificate of validation would cause any such instrument to be inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect after giving effect to the validation.

(4) The date any such instrument shall be deemed to
 have become effective pursuant to this section, which may be prior to or after the filing date.

(5) A statement that the certificate of validation is making, amending, or correcting any such instrument, as applicable, and a copy of any such instrument containing all of the information required to be included under this division for such instrument to be so made, amended, or corrected. An instrument attached to a certificate of validation pursuant to this paragraph need not be separately executed and acknowledged and need not include any statement required by any other section of this division that such instrument has been approved and adopted in accordance with the provisions of such other section.

(6) A statement that the validation has been ordered pursuant to subdivision (e), and a copy of the superior court order issued pursuant to subdivision (e) in respect of such
 validation.

(g) Unless otherwise stated in resolutions adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) or determined by the superior court pursuant to subdivision (e), a corporate action or security of the corporation ratified or validated in accordance with this section relates back to the date of the original corporate action.

(h) As used in this section:

(1) “Corporate action” means any of the following:

(A) Any action or purported action of the board.

(B) Any action or purported action of the members.

(C) Any other action or transaction taken, or purportedly taken, by or on behalf of the corporation.

(2) “Higher approval standard” means any provision set forth in this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation was a party in effect at the time of the original taking or purported taking of a corporate action:

(A) Requiring action of the board or members, at a meeting or by written consent, to be taken by a proportion greater than would have been required pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(B) Requiring a greater proportion of the directors or members to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting than would have been required pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or
 agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(C) Requiring, prohibiting, or prescribing conditions on action of the board or members at a meeting or by written consent, which would not have been required, prohibited, or prescribed pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(D) Requiring separate action of any specified person or persons, which would not have been required pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(i) The corporation shall retain all records related to the ratification or validation of a corporate action under this section in accordance with Section 12590.

(j) If the corporation is a party to a pending legal proceeding in which (1) the validity of a corporate action sought to be ratified or validated pursuant to this section is at issue or (2) the ratification or validation of a corporate action pursuant to this section would result in the dismissal in whole or in part of the proceeding, the corporation shall notify the judge, arbitrator, or other person presiding over the proceeding at least 10 court days prior to adopting resolutions pursuant to subdivision (b) or filing a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) with respect to that corporate action. That person shall have power to stay the ratification or validation as justice and equity may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 151, Sec. 4.   (SB 446)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12221.

“Acknowledged” means that an instrument is either:

(a) Formally acknowledged as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1180) of Chapter 4 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code; or

(b) Accompanied by a declaration in writing signed by the persons executing the same that they are such persons and that the instrument is the act and deed of the person or persons executing the same.

Any certificate of acknowledgment taken without this state before a notary public or a
 judge or clerk of a court of record having an official seal need not be further authenticated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12222.

“Approved by (or approval of) the board” means approved or ratified by the vote of the board or by the vote of a committee authorized to exercise the powers of the board, except as to matters not within the competence of the committee under Section 12352.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12223.

“Approval by (or approval of) a majority of all members” means approval by an affirmative vote (or written ballot in conformity with Section 12463) of a majority of the votes entitled to be cast. Such approval shall include the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding memberships of each class, unit, or grouping of members entitled, by any provision of the articles or bylaws of this part to vote as a class, unit, or grouping of members on the subject matter being voted upon and shall also include the affirmative vote of such greater proportion, including all of the votes of the memberships of any class, unit, or grouping of members if such greater
 proportion is required by the bylaws or by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12224.

“Approval by (or approval of) the members” means approved or ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes represented and voting at a duly held meeting at which a quorum is present (which affirmative votes also constitute a majority of the required quorum) or written ballot in conformity with Section 12463 or by the affirmative vote or written ballot of such greater proportion of the votes of the memberships of any class, unit, or grouping of members as may be provided in the bylaws or in this part for all or any specified member action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12225.

“Articles” includes the articles of incorporation, amendments thereto, amended articles, restated articles, and certificates of incorporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12226.

“Bylaws” includes amendments thereto and amended bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12227.

“Board” means the board of directors of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12228.

“Business corporation” means a corporation as defined in Section 162 of the General Corporation Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12228.3.

“Capital account cooperative” is a worker cooperative in which the entire net book value is reflected in member capital accounts, one for each member, and an unallocated capital account, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 5.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12228.5.

For the purposes of this part, all references to “chairperson of the board,” other than in Section 12353, shall be deemed to refer to all permissible titles for a chair of the board, as permitted by Section 12353.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 74.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12229.

“Chapter” refers to a chapter of this part unless otherwise expressly stated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 792, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12230.

“Class” refers to those memberships which: (a) are identified in the articles or bylaws as being a different type of membership; or (b) have the same rights with respect to voting, dissolution, redemption, distributions and transfer. For the purpose of this section, rights shall be considered the same if they are determined by a formula applied uniformly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12230.5.

“Collective board worker cooperative” means a worker cooperative in which there is only one class of members consisting of worker-members, all of whom are members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 6.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12231.

“Constituent corporation” means a corporation which is merged with one or more other corporations and includes the surviving corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12232.

“Corporation” as used in this part means a corporation which is organized under, or subject to this part, including a central organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 792, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12233.

“Directors” means natural persons, designated in the articles or bylaws or elected by the incorporators, and their successors and natural persons designated, elected, or appointed by any other name or title to act as members of the governing body of the corporation. “Directors” also means alternate directors described in Section 12331. A person who does not have authority to act as a member of the governing body of the corporation, including through voting rights
 as a member of the governing body, is not a director as that term is used in this part regardless of title. However, if the articles or bylaws designate that a natural person is a director or a member of the governing body of the corporation by reason of occupying a specified position within or outside the corporation, that person shall be a director for all purposes and shall have the same rights and obligations, including voting rights, as the other directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 38.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12234.

“Disappearing corporation” means a constituent corporation which is not the surviving corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12235.

“Distribution” means the distribution of any gains, profits or dividends to any member as such, but does not include patronage distributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12236.

“Domestic corporation” means a corporation formed under the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12237.

“Foreign corporation” means a foreign corporation as defined in Section 171.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12238.
